Hawaii, session 2025, GM1229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that darker tints on car
windows have a measurable impact on reducing heat trapped in a
car's interior. The legislature additionally finds that the
current light transmittance limit of thirty-five per cent for
glazing on car windows is inadequate to address the increased
temperatures caused by climate change.
The purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Prohibit a person from installing, mounting, adhering,
affixing, or using any sun screening device in
conjunction with the glazing material of a motor
vehicle with mirrored or high reflective finishes that
produce a red, yellow, amber, or blue appearance;
(2) Require all drivers and passengers of motor vehicles
with applied tint to fully roll down their windows
when stopped by a law enforcement officer at a traffic
stop, subject to certain exceptions;
2025-3283 HB226 GDI HMSO

Page 2 H.B. NO. gf
C.D. 1
(3) Clarify the light transmittance levels on sun
screening devices used in conjunction with glazing
material for front side windows and wing windows;
(4) Exempt rear windows, including rear windshields on
certain vehicles, and side windows to the rear of the
driver on sedans from sun screening device
reguirements;
(5) Increase the minimum and maximum fines for violating
sun screening device requirements; and
(6) Make the absence of the certificate certifying that a
sunscreen device complies with the law in a vehicle
prima facie evidence that an installer is noncompliant
with the law.
SECTION 2. Section 291-21.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§291-21.5 Regulation of motor vehicle sun screening
devices; penalty. (a) No person shall operate, permit the
operation of, cause to be operated, or park any motor vehicle on
a public highway if the glazing material of the motor vehicle:
2025-3283 HB226 CDl HMSO
iiiioniiiiiiHiiiiiiiiniiiii

H.B. NO.
I. . I 'I g“3
C.D. 1
(1) Does not meet the requirements of the Federal Motor
Vehicle Safety Standards 205 in effect at the time of
its manufacture; or
(2) Is used in conjunction with sun screening devices not
exempted from this section by subsection
(e) .
(b) No person shall install, mount, adhere, affix, or use
any sun screening device or combination of devices in
conjunction with the glazing material of a motor vehicle
[whieh]
(1) That does not meet the requirements of the Federal
Motor Vehicle Safety Standards 205 in effect at the
time of the glazing material's manufacture except as
provided in this section[—]; and
(2) With mirrored or high reflective finishes that produce
a red, yellow, amber, or blue appearances as viewed
from the exterior of the motor vehicle.
Any person who violates this section shall be liable for
the removal of any sun screening device applied contrary to this
section.
2025-3283 HB226 CDl HMSO
iiiiiiiiiininmiiiiin

Page 4 H.B. NO. “
I I. . 'I g p 3
C.D. 1
(c) A safety inspection required under section [286-25]
286-26 shall include a test to ensure that the glazing material
and any sun screening devices meet the requirements specified in
this section.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (e), all drivers and
passengers of motor vehicles with applied tint shall fully roll
down their windows when stopped by a law enforcement officer at
a traffic stop. This subsection shall not apply to individuals
unable to do so due to physical disability or mechanical
failure; provided that the driver communicates or cooperates
through other means reasonably available. A driver's or
passenger's failure to comply with this subsection may be cited
as a noncriminal traffic infraction.
[(d)] (e) This section shall not apply to:
(1) Rearview mirrors;
(2) Adjustable nontransparent sun visors [whieh] that are
mounted forward of the side windows and are not
attached to the glazing material;
(3) Signs, stickers, or other materials [whieh] that are
displayed in a seven-inch square in the lower corner
of the windshield farthest removed from the driver or
2025-3283 HB226 GDI HMSO 4

Page 5 H.B. NO 226
H.D. 3
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
signs, stickers, or other materials [whi-eh] that are
displayed in a five-inch square in the lower corner of
the windshield nearest the driver;
(4) Rear trunk lid handle or hinges;
(5) Window wipers and window wiper motors;
(6) Transparent sun screening film materials [whieh] that
are installed, affixed, or applied along the top edge
of the windshield so long as [ouch] the materials do
not encroach upon the AS-1 portion of the windshield
as provided by Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard
205 or no lower than four inches below the top of the
windshield, when measured from the middle point of the
bottom edge of the top windshield moulding if no AS-1
markings can be found in the left or right upper
margin of the windshield;
(7) Sun screening devices for front side wing vents and
windows [whieh-r] that, when used in conjunction with
the glazing material^ have a light transmittance of no
less than thirty-five per cent plus or minus six per
cent ;
2025-3283 HB226 CDl HMSO
MIHiBllllllllilllMOH

Page 6 H.B. NO. ^.3
C.D. 1
(8) Sun screening devices for front side windows and wing
windows necessary for driving visibility [whiefe] that
are adjacent to the [rear of—fehe] driver and [for roar
wi-ndowo] necessary for driving [viaibility which, ]
that, when used in conjunction with the glazing
material, have a light transmittance of no less than
thirty-five per cent plus or minus six per cent;
(9) [Side] Rear windows [which are] , including the rear
windshield on sedans, vans, minivans, trucks, buses,
or other motor vehicles; and side windows to the rear
of the driver [and rear wi-ndewe] on sedans, vans,
minivans, trucks, or buses; provided that the vehicles
are equipped with rearview mirrors on both sides;
(10) Privacy drapes, curtains, or blinds, or any
combination, installed on the interior of motor homes;
or
(11) Transparent sun screening materials, when applied to
the AS-1 portion of the windshield, [whieh-^fteets-] that
meet the requirements of Federal Motor Vehicle Safety
Standard 205.
2025-3283 HB226 CDl HMSO
iiiiwiiiHiiiiiiinuiii

Page 7 H.B. NO.
^.3
C.D. 1
Any person who violates this section shall be
fined:
(1) [Net] ^£q less than $300 [et] and no more than
[■$-tGt-] $550 for each separate offense if the person is
the owner of the motor vehicle [which] is in
violation; and
(2) [Net] less than [$500 nor] $700 and no more than
[■$4-7-0-9t] $1,200 for each separate offense if the
person or business entity is the installer of any sun
screening device [which] that does not meet the
requirements of this section. The installer shall
also reinstall sun protective devices [whiet] that
comply with this section, free of charge, or reimburse
the motor vehicle owner for the cost of installing sun
protective devices by another installer [whieh] that
comply with this section.
The receipt from the installer in the possession of the person
in the motor vehicle at the time of the issuance of the citation
shall be prima facie evidence of the identity of the installer.
The installer shall issue a certificate to the vehicle owner at
the time the sunscreen device is installed certifying that the
2025-3283 HB226 CDl HMSO 7
imiiiiiiiiiiiiiinMii

Page 8 H.B. NO. g?
C.D. 1
device complies with law. Failure of an installer to issue the
regu ired cert ifdca^te shaJJ^^e cons2^dered a viola^tdon of Ui^
section. The certificate shall be stored in the motor vehicle
at all times. The absence of the certificate in the vehicle at
the time of citation shall constitute prima facie evidence of
installer noncompliance.
(g) The department of transportation may adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 91 to establish standard criteria or visual
references for the enforcement of tint color and reflectivity
prohibitions."
SECTION 3. The department of transportation shall notify
all licensed motor vehicle inspection stations of the changes
made by this Act no later than ninety days after the effective
date of this Act.
SECTION 4. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3283 HB226 CDl HMSO 8
fflViiiiniiMiinnii

226
H.B. NO.
APPROVED this 29th day of May . 2025
±
O
d
Q
Q
Q
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 226, HD3, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 226, H.D. 3, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate